District of Columbia statutes.
16-2803

Extension of statute of limitations.

If the notice required under § 16-2802 is served within 90 days of the expiration of the applicable statute of limitations, the time for the commencement of the action shall be extended 90 days from the date of the service of the notice.

History

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-263, § 302, 54 DCR 807